Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 1. Administration of Child Welfare.

§ 43-15-1.
Title of article.

This article may be cited as the “Administration of Child Welfare Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7170-06; Laws, 1946, ch. 419, § 6.

§ 43-15-3.
Powers and duties of Department of Human Services; appeal to Director of Division of Family and Children’s Services for denial of foster care and/or adoption assistance.

The Department of Human Services is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to cooperate fully with the United States Children’s Bureau and Secretary of Labor in establishing, extending and strengthening “child welfare services” for the protection and care of homeless, dependent and neglected children and children in danger of becoming delinquent. Said Department of Human Services is further authorized, empowered and directed to cooperate with the United States Children’s Bureau and Secretary of Labor in developing plans for said “child welfare services” and extending any other cooperation necessary under Section 521 of Public Law No. 271-74th Congress of the United States.

In furtherance of the “child welfare services” referred to in the first paragraph hereof the State Treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to receive on behalf of the state, and to execute all instruments incidental thereto, federal or other funds to be used for “child welfare services,” and to place such funds in a special account to the credit of the “child welfare services,” which said funds shall be expended by the Department of Human Services for the purposes and under the provisions of this article and Section 521 of Public Law No. 271-74th Congress of the United States. It shall be paid out by the State Treasurer as funds appropriated to carry out the provisions of said laws.

The Department of Human Services shall issue all checks on said “child welfare services” fund to persons entitled to payment from said fund. All such sums shall be drawn upon the “child welfare services” fund upon requisition of the Director of the Department of Human Services.

The money in the “child welfare services” fund shall be expended in accordance with the rules and regulations of the United States Children’s Bureau and Secretary of Labor and in accordance with the plan developed by the Department of Human Services and the United States Children’s Bureau under Section 521 of Public Law No. 271-74th Congress of the United States, and shall not be used for any other purpose.

If a claim for foster care and/or adoption assistance under Title IV-E of the Federal Social Security Act is not acted upon within a reasonable time after the filing of the claim, or is denied in whole or in part, the claimant may appeal to the Director of the Division of Family and Children’s Services in the manner and form prescribed by the Department of Human Services. The Director of the Division of Family and Children’s Services shall, upon receipt of such an appeal, give the claimant reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing. The Director of the Division of Family and Children’s Services may also, upon his or her own motion, review any decision regarding a claim, and may consider any claim upon which a decision has not been made within a reasonable time. All decisions of the Director of Family and Children’s Services shall be final and binding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7169; Laws, 1936, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 12; Laws, 2000, ch. 380, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 43-15-5.
Administration of child welfare services.

The Department of Human Services shall have authority and it shall be its duty to administer or supervise all public child welfare services, including those services, responsibilities, duties and powers with which the county departments of human services are charged and empowered in this article; administer and supervise the licensing and inspection of all private child placing agencies; provide for the care of dependent and neglected children in foster family homes or in institutions, supervise the care of such children and those of illegitimate birth; supervise the importation of children; and supervise the operation of all state institutions for children. The Department of Human Services shall be authorized to purchase hospital and medical insurance coverage for those children placed in foster care by the state or county departments of human services who are not otherwise eligible for medical assistance under the Mississippi Medicaid Law. The Department of Human Services shall be further authorized to purchase burial or life insurance not exceeding One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) for those children placed in foster care by the state or county departments of human services. All insurance coverage authorized herein may be purchased with any funds other than state funds available to the Department of Human Services, including those funds available to the child which are administered by the department.

Any person, partnership, group, corporation, organization or association desiring to operate a child residential home, as defined in Section 43-16-3, may make application for a license for such a facility to the Department of Human Services on the application forms furnished for this purpose by the department. If an applicant meets the published rules and regulations of the department regarding minimum standards for a child residential home, then the applicant shall be granted a license by the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7170-01; Laws, 1938, ch. 172; Laws, 1946, ch. 419, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 443, § 1(1); Laws, 1982, ch. 416; Laws, 1989, ch. 493, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-15-6.
Criminal background checks and child abuse registry checks for providers of children’s services in residential setting; authority to exclude certain crimes as disqualifying from providing child care; penalties; administrative immunity.

Any person, institution, facility, clinic, organization or other entity that provides services to children in a residential setting where care, lodging, maintenance, and counseling or therapy for alcohol or controlled substance abuse or for any other emotional disorder or mental illness is provided for children, whether for compensation or not, that holds himself, herself, or itself out to the public as providing such services, and that is entrusted with the care of the children to whom he, she, or it provides services, because of the nature of the services and the setting in which the services are provided shall be subject to the provisions of this section.

Each entity to which this section applies shall complete, through the appropriate governmental authority, a national criminal history record information check and a child abuse registry check for each owner, operator, employee, prospective employee, volunteer or prospective volunteer of the entity and/or any other that has or may have unsupervised access to a child served by the entity. In order to determine the applicant’s suitability for employment, the entity shall ensure that the applicant be fingerprinted by local law enforcement, and the results forwarded to the Department of Public Safety. If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the FBI for a national criminal history record check.

An owner, operator, employee, prospective employee, volunteer or prospective volunteer of the entity and/or any other that has or may have unsupervised access to a child who has a criminal history of conviction or pending indictment of a crime, whether a misdemeanor or a felony, that bears upon an individual’s fitness to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children as set forth in this chapter may not provide child care or operate, or be licensed as, a residential child care program, foster parent, or foster home.

All fees incurred in compliance with this section shall be borne by the individual or entity to which subsection (1) applies.

The Department of Human Services shall have the authority to set fees, to exclude a particular crime or crimes or a substantiated finding of child abuse and/or neglect as disqualifying individuals or entities from providing foster care or residential child care, and adopt such other rules and regulations as may be required to carry out the provisions of this section.

Any entity that violates the provisions of this section by failure to complete sex offense criminal history record information and felony conviction record information checks, as required under subsection (3) of this section, shall be subject to a penalty of up to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each such violation and may be enjoined from further operation until it complies with this section in actions maintained by the Attorney General.

The Department of Human Services and/or its officers, employees, attorneys, agents and representatives shall not be held civilly liable for any findings, recommendations or actions taken pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 559, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 434, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 43-15-7.
County department authorized to provide protective services; appropriation of funds.

The county department of public welfare is hereby authorized to provide protective services for children as will conserve home life; assume responsibility for the care and support of dependent children needing public care away from their homes; place children found by the department to be dependent or without proper care in suitable institutions or private homes, and cooperate with public and private institutions and agencies in placing such children in suitable institutions or private homes; accept custody or guardianship, through one of its designated employees, of any child, when appointed as custodian or guardian in the manner provided by law.

The board of supervisors in each county is hereby empowered, in its discretion, to set aside and appropriate out of the tax levied and collected to support the poor of the county or out of the county general fund necessary monies to be administered by the county department of public welfare to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7170-02; Laws, 1946, ch. 419, § 2.

§ 43-15-9.
Article inapplicable to orphans’ homes, etc.

None of the provisions of this article shall apply to any orphan’s home, child caring agency or children’s home society under the jurisdiction of and maintained by any fraternal organization, religious or fraternal denomination or nonprofit association or corporation organized and exclusively controlled by any religious denomination.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7170-03; Laws, 1946, ch. 419, § 3.

§ 43-15-11.
Expenditure of county and municipal moneys for support and maintenance of homeless and destitute children.

The board of supervisors of any county and/or the mayor and board of commissioners of any city and/or the mayor and board of aldermen of any municipality in this state are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to expend out of any moneys in their respective treasuries, to be drawn by warrant thereon, a sum or sums of money not exceeding a total of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) annually per million dollars ($1,000,000.00) of the assessed valuation of the real and personal property thereof for the purpose of providing for the care, support and maintenance of homeless or destitute children of any county or municipality of this state who are supported, cared for, maintained and placed for adoption by any children’s home society which operates over and serves the entire State of Mississippi, and which is approved and licensed by the Mississippi Department of Public Welfare.

The authority granted in this section is supplemental of and in addition to all existing authority for the expenditure of funds by such boards of supervisors and municipal governing authorities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7170-21; Laws, 1958, ch. 539, §§ 1-3, eff upon passage (approved May 6, 1958).

§ 43-15-13.
Foster care placement program; objectives; system of individualized plans and reviews; training program for persons who provide foster care and relative care; placement priorities and goals; changes in placement; notice to families; rights and responsibilities of persons who provide foster care and relative care.

For purposes of this section, “children” means persons found within the state who are under the age of twenty-one (21) years, and who were placed in the custody of the Department of Child Protection Services by the youth court of the appropriate county. For purposes of this chapter, “commercial sexual exploitation” means any sexual act or crime of a sexual nature, which is committed against a child for financial or economic gain, to obtain a thing of value, for quid pro quo exchange of property or any other purpose.

The Department of Child Protection Services shall establish a foster care placement program for children whose custody lies with the department, with the following objectives:

Protecting and promoting the health, safety and welfare of children;

Preventing the unnecessary separation of children from their families by identifying family problems, assisting families in resolving their problems and preventing the breakup of the family where the prevention of child removal is desirable and possible when the child can be cared for at home without endangering the child’s health and safety;

Remedying or assisting in the solution of problems that may result in the neglect, abuse, exploitation, commercial sexual exploitation, human trafficking or delinquency of children;

Restoring to their families children who have been removed, by the provision of services to the child and the families when the child can be cared for at home without endangering the child’s health and safety;

Placing children in suitable adoptive homes approved by a licensed adoption agency or family protection specialist, in cases where restoration to the biological family is not safe, possible or appropriate;

Assuring safe and adequate care of children away from their homes, in cases where the child cannot be returned home or cannot be placed for adoption, including temporary or emergency placement with a relative or fictive kin pending youth court action on the case. At the time of placement, the department shall implement concurrent planning, as described in subsection (8) of this section, so that permanency may occur at the earliest opportunity. Consideration of possible failure or delay of reunification should be given, to the end that the placement made is the best available placement to provide permanency for the child; and

Providing a family protection specialist or worker or team of such specialists or workers for a family and child throughout the implementation of their permanent living arrangement plan. Wherever feasible, the same family protection specialist or worker or team shall remain on the case until the child is no longer under the jurisdiction of the youth court.

The Department of Child Protection Services shall administer a system of individualized plans, reviews and reports once every six (6) months for each child under its custody within the State of Mississippi, which document each child who has been adjudged a neglected, abandoned or abused child, including a child alleged to have experienced commercial sexual exploitation and/or human trafficking and whose custody was changed by court order as a result of that adjudication, and each public or private facility licensed by the department. The Department of Child Protection Services’ administrative review shall be completed on each child within the first three (3) months and a relative placement, fictive kin placement, or foster care review once every six (6) months after the child’s initial forty-eight-hour shelter hearing. That system shall be for the purpose of enhancing potential family life for the child by the development of individual plans to return the child to the child’s natural parent or parents, or to refer the child to the appropriate court for termination of parental rights and placement in a permanent relative’s home, adoptive home or foster/adoptive home. The goal of the Department of Child Protection Services shall be to return the child to the child’s natural parent(s) or refer the child to the appropriate court for termination of parental rights and placement in a permanent relative’s home, adoptive home or foster/adoptive home within the time periods specified in this subsection or in subsection (4) of this section. In furthering this goal, the department shall establish policy and procedures designed to appropriately place children in permanent homes, provide counseling services and other appropriate services to children who have been victims of commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking. The policy shall include a system of reviews for all children in foster care, as follows: foster care counselors in the department shall make all possible contact with the child’s natural parent(s), custodial parent(s) of all siblings of the child, and any interested relative for the first two (2) months following the child’s entry into the foster care system, and provide care for victims of commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking. For purposes of contacting custodial parent(s) of a sibling, siblings include those who are considered a sibling under state law, and those who would have been considered a sibling under state law, except for termination or disruption of parental rights. For any child who has been in foster care for fifteen (15) of the last twenty-two (22) months regardless of whether the foster care was continuous for all of those twenty-two (22) months, the department shall file a petition to terminate the parental rights of the child’s parents. The time period starts to run from the date the court makes a finding of abuse and/or neglect, or commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking, or sixty (60) days from when the child was removed from his or her home, whichever is earlier. The department can choose not to file a termination of parental rights petition if the following apply:

The child is being cared for by a relative; and/or

The department has documented compelling and extraordinary reasons why termination of parental rights would not be in the best interests of the child. Before granting or denying a request by the department for an extension of time for filing a termination of parental rights action, the court shall receive a written report on the progress which a parent of the child has made in treatment, to be made to the court in writing by a mental health/substance abuse therapist or counselor.

In the case of any child who is placed in foster care on or after July 1, 1998, except in cases of aggravated circumstances prescribed in Section 43-21-603(7)(c), the child’s natural parent(s) will have a reasonable time to be determined by the court, which shall not exceed a six-month period of time, in which to meet the service agreement with the department for the benefit of the child unless the department has documented extraordinary and compelling reasons for extending the time period in the best interest of the child. If this agreement has not been satisfactorily met, simultaneously the child will be referred to the appropriate court for termination of parental rights and placement in a permanent relative’s home, adoptive home or a foster/adoptive home. For children under the age of three (3) years, termination of parental rights shall be initiated within six (6) months, unless the department has documented compelling and extraordinary circumstances, and placement in a permanent relative’s home, adoptive home or foster/adoptive home within two (2) months. For children who have been abandoned under the provisions of Section 97-5-1, termination of parental rights shall be initiated within thirty (30) days and placement in an adoptive home shall be initiated without necessity for placement in a foster home. The department need not initiate termination of parental rights proceedings where the child has been placed in durable legal custody, durable legal relative guardianship, or long-term or formalized foster care by a court of competent jurisdiction.

The foster care review once every six (6) months shall be conducted by the youth court or its designee(s), and/or by personnel within the Department of Child Protection Services or by a designee or designees of the department and may include others appointed by the department, and the review shall include at a minimum an evaluation of the child based on the following:

The extent of the care and support provided by the parents or parent while the child is in temporary custody;

The extent of communication with the child by parents, parent or guardian;

The degree of compliance by the agency and the parents with the social service plan established;

The methods of achieving the goal and the plan establishing a permanent home for the child;

Social services offered and/or utilized to facilitate plans for establishing a permanent home for the child; and

Relevant testimony and recommendations from the foster parent of the child, the grandparents of the child, the guardian ad litem of the child, when appointed, the Court-Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) of the child, representatives of any private care agency that has cared for the child, the family protection worker or family protection specialist assigned to the case, and any other relevant testimony pertaining to the case.

Each child’s review plan once every six (6) months shall be filed with the court which awarded custody and shall be made available to natural parents or foster parents upon approval of the court. The court shall make a finding as to the degree of compliance by the agency and the parent(s) with the child’s social service plan. The court also shall find that the child’s health and safety are the paramount concern. In the interest of the child, the court shall, where appropriate, initiate proceedings on its own motion. The Department of Child Protection Services shall report to the Legislature as to the number of those children, the findings of the foster care review board and relevant statistical information in foster care in a semiannual report to the Legislature to be submitted to the Joint Oversight Committee of the Department of Child Protection Services. The report shall not refer to the specific name of any child in foster care.

The Department of Child Protection Services, with the cooperation and assistance of the State Department of Health, shall develop and implement a training program for foster care parents to indoctrinate them as to their proper responsibilities upon a child’s entry into their foster care. The program shall provide a minimum of twelve (12) clock hours of training, which shall include training foster care parents about providing mental and physical support to children who have experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking. The foster care training program shall be satisfactorily completed by such foster care parents before or within ninety (90) days after child placement with the parent. Record of the foster care parent’s training program participation shall be filed with the court as part of a child’s foster care review plan once every six (6) months.

The court may waive foster care training for an appropriate relative placement.

A relative exempted from foster care training is not eligible for board payments, foster care payments, kinship care payments, therapeutic care payments, or any other monthly payments from the department to assist in the care of the child.

When the Department of Child Protection Services is considering placement of a child in a foster home and when the department deems it to be in the best interest of the child, the department shall give first priority to placing the child in the home of one (1) of the child’s relatives within the third degree, as computed by the civil law rule.

In placing the child in a relative’s home, the department may waive any rule, regulation or policy applicable to placement in foster care that would otherwise require the child to have a separate bed or bedroom or have a bedroom of a certain size, if placing the child in a relative’s home would be in the best interest of the child and those requirements cannot be met in the relative’s home.

The court may waive foster care training for a relative only when appropriate.

The Legislature recognizes that the best interests of the child require that the child be placed in the most permanent living arrangement as soon as is practicably possible. To achieve this goal, the Department of Child Protection Services is directed to conduct concurrent planning so that a permanent living arrangement may occur at the earliest opportunity. Permanent living arrangements may include prevention of placement of a child outside the home of the family when the child can be cared for at home without endangering the child’s health or safety; reunification with the family, when safe and appropriate, if temporary placement is necessary; or movement of the child toward the most permanent living arrangement and permanent legal status. When a child is placed in foster care or relative care, the department shall first ensure and document that reasonable efforts, as defined in Section 43-21-105, were made to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from the child’s home. The department’s first priority shall be to make reasonable efforts to reunify the family when temporary placement of the child occurs or shall request a finding from the court that reasonable efforts are not appropriate or have been unsuccessful. A decision to place a child in foster care or relative care shall be made with consideration of the child’s health, safety and best interests. At the time of placement, consideration should also be given so that if reunification fails or is delayed, the placement made is the best available placement to provide a permanent living arrangement for the child. The department shall adopt rules addressing concurrent planning for reunification and a permanent living arrangement. The department shall consider the following factors when determining appropriateness of concurrent planning:

The likelihood of prompt reunification;

The past history of the family;

The barriers to reunification being addressed by the family;

The level of cooperation of the family;

The foster parents’ willingness to work with the family to reunite;

The willingness and ability of the foster family or relative placement to provide an adoptive home or long-term placement;

The age of the child; and

Placement of siblings.

If the department has placed a child in foster care or relative care under a court order, the department may not change the child’s placement unless the department specifically documents to the court that the current placement is unsafe or unsuitable or that another placement is in the child’s best interests unless the new placement is in an adoptive home or other permanent placement. Except in emergency circumstances as determined by the department or where the court orders placement of the child under Section 43-21-303, the foster parents, grandparents or other relatives of the child shall be given an opportunity to contest the specific reasons documented by the department at least seventy-two (72) hours before any such departure, and the court may conduct a review of that placement unless the new placement is in an adoptive home or other permanent placement. When a child is returned to foster care or relative care, the former foster parents or relative placement shall be given the prior right of return placement in order to eliminate additional trauma to the child.

The Department of Child Protection Services shall provide the foster parents, grandparents or other relatives with at least a seventy-two-hour notice of departure for any child placed in their foster care or relative care, except in emergency circumstances as determined by the department or where the court orders placement of the child under Section 43-21-303. The parent/legal guardian, grandparents of the child, guardian ad litem and the court exercising jurisdiction shall be notified in writing when the child leaves foster care or relative care placement, regardless of whether the child’s departure was planned or unplanned. The only exceptions to giving a written notice to the parent(s) are when a parent has voluntarily released the child for adoption or the parent’s legal rights to the child have been terminated through the appropriate court with jurisdiction.

The Department of Child Protection Services shall extend the following rights to persons who provide foster care and relative care:

A clear understanding of their role while providing care and the roles of the birth parent(s) and the placement agency in respect to the child in care;

Respect, consideration, trust and value as a family who is making an important contribution to the agency’s objectives;

Involvement in all the agency’s crucial decisions regarding the child as team members who have pertinent information based on their day-to-day knowledge of the child in care;

Support from the family protection worker or the family protection specialist in efforts to do a better day-to-day job in caring for the child and in working to achieve the agency’s objectives for the child and the birth family through provision of:

Pertinent information about the child and the birth family;

Help in using appropriate resources to meet the child’s needs, including counseling or other services for victims of commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking;

Direct interviews between the family protection worker or specialist and the child, previously discussed and understood by the foster parents;

Information regarding whether the child experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking;

The opportunity to develop confidence in making day-to-day decisions in regard to the child;

The opportunity to learn and grow in their vocation through planned education in caring for the child;

The opportunity to be heard regarding agency practices that they may question;

Reimbursement for costs of the child’s care in the form of a board payment based on the age of the child as prescribed in Section 43-15-17 unless the relative is exempt from foster care training and chooses to exercise the exemption; and

Reimbursement for property damages caused by children in the custody of the Department of Child Protection Services in an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), as evidenced by written documentation. The Department of Child Protection Services shall not incur liability for any damages as a result of providing this reimbursement.

The Department of Child Protection Services shall require the following responsibilities from participating persons who provide foster care and relative care:

Understanding the department’s function in regard to the foster care and relative care program and related social service programs;

Sharing with the department any information which may contribute to the care of children;

Functioning within the established goals and objectives to improve the general welfare of the child;

Recognizing the problems in home placement that will require professional advice and assistance and that such help should be utilized to its full potential;

Recognizing that the family who cares for the child will be one of the primary resources for preparing a child for any future plans that are made, including return to birth parent(s), termination of parental rights or reinstitutionalization;

Expressing their views of agency practices which relate to the child with the appropriate staff member;

Understanding that all information shared with the persons who provide foster care or relative care about the child and his/her birth parent(s) must be held in the strictest of confidence;

Cooperating with any plan to reunite the child with his birth family and work with the birth family to achieve this goal; and

Attending dispositional review hearings and termination of parental rights hearings conducted by a court of competent jurisdiction, or providing their recommendations to the court in writing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 443, § 1(2)(3); Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 70; Laws, 1982, ch. 318; Laws, 1989, ch. 412, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 603, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 381, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 479, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 600, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 538, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 420, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 427, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 420, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-15-14.
Emergency placement of children in home care; performance of federal name-based criminal history records check of all adults residing in placement home.

As used in this section, “emergency placement” means those limited instances when the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services is placing a child in the home of private individuals, including relatives, neighbors or friends, as a result of a sudden unavailability of the child’s primary caretaker.

During an emergency placement situation when a child must be placed in home care due to the absence of parents or custodians, the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services (MDCPS) may request that a criminal justice agency perform a federal name-based criminal history records check of each adult residing in the home. Name-based check results may be provided to the Mississippi Criminal Information Center (MCIC) of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, which shall then provide a complete set of each adult resident’s fingerprints to the MCIC central repository for the immediate submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) within fifteen (15) calendar days from the date the name search was conducted. The central repository shall either positively identify the fingerprint subject or forward the fingerprints to the FBI within fifteen (15) calendar days from the date the name search was conducted. The child shall be removed from the home immediately if any adult resident fails to provide fingerprints and written permission to perform a federal criminal history records check when requested.

When placement of a child in a home is denied as a result of a name-based criminal history records check of a resident, and the resident contests that denial, each such resident shall, within fifteen (15) calendar days, submit to MDCPS a complete set of the resident’s fingerprints with written permission allowing MCIC to forward the fingerprints to the MCIC criminal history records repository for submission to the FBI.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 395, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 27, 2017); Laws, 2018, ch. 336, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 43-15-15.
Registry of children in custody of State Department of Public Welfare and public or private agencies.

The State Department of Public Welfare shall maintain a registry of children whose custody lies with them and private or public agencies licensed by the department. Said registry shall contain classifications of children as:

Temporary custody for evaluation, not to exceed three (3) months;

Temporary custody not to exceed one (1) year with the plan to return custody to the natural parents;

Temporary custody, not to exceed two (2) years, with a plan to free for adoption;

Children freed for adoption;

Children ages fourteen (14) and above who have voluntarily chosen not to be adopted and cannot be returned to their own homes; and

Children who are institutionalized and for whom placement in an adoptive home is not feasible.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 443, § 1(4), eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1978).

§ 43-15-17.
Payments for supportive services; relative care payments.

The Department of Child Protection Services is authorized to make such payments as may be appropriate for supportive services to facilitate either the return of children to their natural parents or their adoption, depending upon and contingent upon the availability of the Department of Child Protection Services securing or having sufficient funds to render this supportive service. Upon court order, the parent(s) shall be responsible for reimbursing the department for any foster care or kinship care payments made on behalf of his or her child, based upon financial ability to pay, until such time as there is a termination of parental rights regarding the child, or the child is adopted.

For those children placed in foster care by the state or county departments of human services, the department shall make monthly payments for the support of these children’s room and board, clothing, allowance and personal needs. From and after July 1, 1998, and subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated therefor, the Department of Child Protection Services’ foster care and therapeutic care monthly payment schedule in effect before that date shall be increased by One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per month, with that minimum payment not to preclude the department from increasing payments in later years as funds become available. From and after July 1, 1998, in order for foster parents to receive the monthly payments authorized under this subsection (2), the Department of Child Protection Services shall require foster care placements to be licensed as foster care homes and shall require prospective foster parents to satisfactorily complete an appropriate training program that emphasizes the goal of the foster care program to provide stable foster placement until a permanency outcome is achieved.

For a child placed in the care of the child’s relative within the third degree by the state or county departments of human services, unless a child is placed in the care of a relative who is exempt from foster care training requirements, the department shall make monthly payments to defray the relative’s expense of furnishing room and board. The department’s relative care payment shall be in an amount up to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount of the foster care board payment. The department may continue to make those payments to the relative after the department relinquishes legal custody of the child to the relative if the relative has complied with foster care training requirements. Any such payments for relative care shall be subject to specific appropriation therefor by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 443, § 1(5); Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 538, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 427, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.